Washington statutes.
RCW 36.53.030

To whom license granted—Notice of intention if nonowner.

No license shall be granted to any person other than the owner of the land embracing or adjoining the lake or stream where the ferry is proposed to be kept, unless the owner neglects to apply therefor. Whenever application for a license is made by any person other than the owner, the board of county commissioners shall not grant it, unless proof is made that the applicant caused notice, in writing, of his or her intention to make such application to be given to such owner, if residing in the county, at least ten days before the session of the board of county commissioners at which application is made.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4086; 1963 c 4 s 36.53.030. Prior: Code 1881 s 3004; 1879 p 61 s 40; 1869 p 280 s 42; 1863 p 522 s 3; 1854 p 354 s 3; RRS s 5464.]